California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) Prior to the transport of anhydrous hydrazine, methylhydrazine, dimethylhydrazine, Aerozine 50, fuming nitric acid, liquid fluorine, or nitrogen tetroxide in bulk packaging, except when that packaging contains only residue, outside the confines of a facility where that material was used or stored, or prior to the delivery of that bulk material to a carrier for transport, each carrier shall provide advance notification, in writing, of the shipment, to the department, which, in turn, shall notify the sheriff of each county and police chief of each city in which is located the proposed route. Notification shall be made through the Department of Justice’s California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System. The sheriffs and police chiefs shall, in turn, make timely notification to the fire chiefs within their respective jurisdictions through a mutually agreed upon communications system.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies only to the extent that it does not conflict with federal law.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Bulk packaging” has the same meaning as defined in Section 171.8 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Fire chief” means the fire chief of each county and city fire department and the fire chief of each fire protection district serving a population greater than 15,000 in which is located the proposed route. This paragraph does not apply to any fire chief of a fire department or fire protection district that is composed of 50 percent or more volunteer firefighters.

(3) “Residue” has the same meaning as defined in Section 171.8 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

32051.

(a) Each advance notification required by Section 32050 shall contain all of the following information:

(1) The name, address, and emergency telephone number of the manufacturer, shipper, carrier, and receiver of the shipment.

(2) A current copy of a material data safety sheet, as designated by the department, regarding the material.

(3) If the shipment is originating within California, the point of origin of the shipment and the 48-hour period during which departure of the shipment is estimated to occur, the destination of the shipment within California, and the 48-hour period during which the shipment is estimated to arrive.

(4) If the shipment is originating outside of California, the point of origin of the shipment and the 48-hour period during which the shipment is estimated to arrive at the state boundary, the destination of the shipment within California, and the 48-hour period during which the shipment is estimated to arrive.

(5) A telephone number and address for current shipment information.

(b) The department shall design a standard notification form to include all of the information specified in subdivision (a) and shall make these forms available by April 1, 1989.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

32052.

(a) The notification required by Section 32050 shall reach the department at least 72 hours before the beginning of the 48-hour period during which departure of the shipment of any material designated in Section 32050 is estimated to occur, and the department shall notify the sheriffs and the police chiefs as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 32050 at least 36 hours before the beginning of the 48-hour departure period specified in subdivision (a) of Section 32051, who shall notify the fire chiefs, as provided in Section 32050. A copy of the notification shall be retained by the department for three years.

(b) The carrier shall also notify, by telephone or telegram, the department if there are any changes in the scheduling of a shipment, in the routes to be used for shipment, or any cancellation of a shipment. The department shall, in turn, notify the sheriffs and the police chiefs specified in subdivision (a) of Section 32050 that would be affected by these changes in the scheduling of a shipment, in the routes to be used for a shipment, or the cancellation of a shipment, who shall notify the fire chiefs, as provided in Section 32050. The department shall maintain for three years a record of each telegram and telephonic notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

32053.

(a) Any carrier who violates Section 32050, 32051, or 32052, in addition to any other penalty provided by law, is subject to a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation. For purposes of this section, each day of a continuing violation is a separate violation.

(b) When establishing the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider, in addition to other relevant circumstances, all of the following:

(1) The extent of the harm caused by the violation.

(2) The persistence of the violation.

(3) The number of prior violations by the same violator.

(4) The deterrent value of the penalty based on the financial resources of the violator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.3. TRANSPORTATION OF INHALATION HAZARDS [32100. - 32109.]

32100.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this division, to create a special category of inhalation hazards and poison gases and to establish special safeguards for their transportation.

These materials are highly toxic, spread rapidly, and require rapid and widespread evacuation if there is loss of containment or a fire. For these reasons, the Legislature intends to more rigorously restrict and otherwise control the transportation of these materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

32100.5.

This division applies to the transportation of inhalation hazards in bulk packaging, except when that packaging contains only residue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

32101.

As used in this division:

(a) “Inhalation hazard” means any material defined as “Poison A” pursuant to Section 173.326 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations or for which a “Poison-Inhalation Hazard” or “Inhalation Hazard” shipping paper description is required pursuant to Section 172.203 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) “Bulk packaging” means the same as defined in Section 171.8 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Residue” means the same as defined in Section 171.8 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) “Inspection stop” means any location designated as such in regulations adopted pursuant to this division or any safe stopping place.

(e) “Safe parking place” means any loading or unloading facility or motor carrier terminal where the driver may safely and lawfully park and leave the vehicle unattended when authorized by the owner or person in charge of the facility or terminal.

(f) “Safe stopping place” means any place designated by the department pursuant to this division where a driver may stop for food, fuel, or any other necessary reason, provided the vehicle is attended at all times. A vehicle is “attended” when the driver or person in charge of it is awake and occupies any part of it except the sleeper berth, or is within 100 feet of the vehicle and has an unobstructed view of it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

32102.

(a) The department may adopt any regulations that are necessary to administer this division. It is a misdemeanor for any person to violate this division or regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(b) The department shall, by regulation, designate through routes in this state which are to be used for the transportation of inhalation hazards. The department may also designate separate through routes for the transportation of inhalation hazards composed of any chemical rocket propellant specified in Section 32050. The Department of Transportation shall assist the department in developing the recommended routes. The department shall hold public hearings in each field operation division of the department in which are located proposed routes. In recommending the through routes, the department shall do both of the following:

(1) Perform a risk assessment which shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of the population density, capabilities of the emergency response personnel near the proposed routes, and the safety of the roadways.

(2) Consult with officials having the responsibility for the prevention and suppression of fire in communities in which are located the proposed routes, the representatives of persons engaged in the transportation of inhalation hazards, manufacturers of inhalation hazards, and the State Fire Marshal.

(c) The department shall prepare for distribution to persons engaged in the transportation of inhalation hazards maps which clearly indicate the routes which are to be used for the transportation of inhalation hazards.

(d) The department shall prepare for distribution to persons engaged in the transportation of inhalation hazards a list of locations of required inspection stops and safe stopping places and shall revise the list to keep it current.

(e) Until other routes are designated by the department for the transportation of chemical rocket propellants pursuant to subdivision (b), the designated through routes for the transportation of chemical rocket propellants to Vandenberg Air Force Base shall be those routes designated in the letter of agreement between the department and the United States Department of the Air Force executed in 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32103.

(a) Every motor carrier shall make available in each vehicle used in the transportation of inhalation hazards the latest map showing the routes to be used for the transportation of inhalation hazards and a list of the safe stopping places and inspection stops for vehicles transporting inhalation hazards as prescribed by regulations of the department. The carrier shall require that the driver be thoroughly familiar with this division before operating any vehicle in the transportation of inhalation hazards.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.   Section operative January 1, 1992, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

32104.

(a) It is unlawful for the motor carrier or its authorized agent to drive or to permit the driving of any vehicle transporting inhalation hazards, or for the driver to drive the vehicle, upon any public highway not designated in regulations adopted by the department as a route for the transportation of inhalation hazards. This subdivision shall not apply when the use of the highway is required (1) to permit delivery of, or the loading of, inhalation hazards at a point not on a highway designated as a route for the transportation of inhalation hazards, or (2) to permit the vehicle to proceed to, and return from, an inspection stop, safe stopping place, or safe parking place.

(b) It is unlawful for the driver of any vehicle transporting inhalation hazards to stop at any place other than a safe stopping place, safe parking place, or an inspection stop unless the vehicle is disabled or except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or to comply with the orders of a peace officer or an official traffic control device.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.   Section operative January 1, 1992, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

32105.

(a) Unless there is no practicable alternative, every driver of a vehicle transporting inhalation hazards shall avoid, by prearrangement of routes, driving into or through heavily populated areas, congested thoroughfares, or places where crowds are assembled. Operating convenience is not a basis for determining whether it is practicable to operate a vehicle in accordance with this subdivision.

(b) No vehicle transporting inhalation hazards shall be left unattended upon any street or highway.

(c) Inspection of the following items of equipment shall be made immediately preceding the actual transportation of an inhalation hazard:

(1) Brakes and the brake system.

(2) Steering, connection devices, and lighting systems.

(3) All tires.

(4) All supplemental equipment as required by Section 32106.

(d) En route inspection of tires and brakes on vehicles transporting inhalation hazards shall be performed at the following locations:

(1) At an inspection stop at least every four hours or 150 miles traveled, whichever occurs first, or as close thereto as is practicable, depending upon the proximity of those inspection stops.

(2) Regardless of elapsed time or miles traveled, at the top of and prior to descending any grade upon which the Department of Transportation has declared a speed limit for trucks of less than 55 miles per hour as provided by Section 22407. The inspection shall be made off the roadway.

(3) Regardless of elapsed time or miles traveled, at any location designated in regulations of the department as a required inspection stop.

(e) (1) Every person operating a vehicle transporting an inhalation hazard shall complete a record of every inspection which is required pursuant to this section in the form approved by the department showing the time and place of every inspection.

(2) The record of every inspection shall be made at the time the inspection is conducted.

(3) The person making the inspection shall certify the fact in the record.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.   Section operative January 1, 1992, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

32106.

Every vehicle used in the transportation of an inhalation hazard, in addition to any other equipment required by law, shall be equipped and maintained as required by this section.

(a) Brakes and the brake system shall be maintained in good and safe operating condition.

(b) Steering, connection devices, and lighting systems shall be maintained in good operating condition.

(c) All tires shall be in good condition, properly matched and inflated. Except as may be necessary to cause immediate replacement, no vehicle shall be driven unless all tires in actual use on the vehicle are properly inflated.

(d) Fire extinguishers and other safety equipment prescribed by regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 34501 shall be carried in each vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

32107.

Every vehicle, or combination of vehicles, transporting an inhalation hazard shall contain a self-contained breathing apparatus and equipment capable of immediate communication with emergency personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

32109.

Nothing in this division exempts any vehicle transporting inhalation hazards and subject to this division, or the owner or any other person, from other provisions of this code. All those other provisions relating to the driving and movement of vehicles, and the size, weight and equipment thereof, shall apply as applicable to each and every vehicle engaged in transporting inhalation hazards subject to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.5. TRANSPORTATION OF RADIOACTIVE MATERIALS [33000. - 33002.]

33000.

Subject to the provisions of Section 114765 of the Health and Safety Code, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, after consulting with the State Department of Health Services, shall adopt regulations specifying the time that shipments may occur and the routes that are to be used in the transportation of cargoes of hazardous radioactive materials, as are defined in regulations of the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 427.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.

(a) Prior to the transport of any hazardous radioactive materials containing cargoes of commercially produced, spent radioactive fuel outside the confines of a facility where that material was used or stored, or prior to the delivery of these materials to a carrier for transport, each carrier shall provide advance notification, in writing, of the shipment to the Department of the California Highway Patrol, which, in turn, shall notify all of the following persons:

(1) The fire chiefs of each city and county fire department and the fire chiefs of each fire protection district serving a population greater than 15,000, which city, county, or fire protection district is located along the proposed route. The Department of the California Highway Patrol, however, shall notify only those fire chiefs who have requested, in writing, to be so notified. A fire chief may revoke this request, in writing, at any time.

This paragraph does not apply to any fire chief of a fire department or fire protection district that is composed of 50 percent or more volunteer firefighters.

(2) The police chiefs of each city where surface transportation would occur along the proposed route.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies only to the extent that it does not conflict with federal law.

(c) Each advance notification shall contain the following information:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the shipper, carrier, and receiver of the shipment.

(2) If the shipment originates within California, the point of origin of the shipment and the 48-hour period during which departure of the shipment is estimated to occur, the destination of the shipment within California, and the 48-hour period during which the shipment is estimated to arrive.

(3) If the shipment originates outside of California, the point of origin of the shipment and the 48-hour period during which the shipment is estimated to arrive at state boundaries, the destination of the shipment within California, and the 48-hour period during which the shipment is estimated to arrive.

(4) A telephone number and address for current shipment information.

(d) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall design a standard notification form to include all of the information specified in subdivision (c) and shall make these forms available by April 1, 1984.

(e) The notification is required to reach the Department of the California Highway Patrol at least 72 hours before the beginning of the 48-hour period during which departure of the shipment is estimated to occur, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall notify the fire chiefs who have requested notification and the police chiefs specified in subdivision (a) at least 36 hours before the beginning of this 48-hour period. A copy of the notification shall be retained by the Department of the California Highway Patrol for three years.

(f) The carrier shall also notify, by telephone or telegram, the Department of the California Highway Patrol if there are any changes in the scheduling of a shipment, in the routes to be used for a shipment, or any cancellation of a shipment. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall, in turn, notify the fire chiefs who have requested notification and the police chiefs specified in subdivision (a) who would be affected by these changes in the scheduling of a shipment, in the routes to be used for a shipment, or the cancellation of a shipment. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall maintain for three years a record of each telegram and telephonic notification.

(g) Any person or agency that receives any information pursuant to this section shall not disseminate or reveal this information to any other person, state agency, city, county, or local agency unless the person or agency determines that disseminating or revealing this information is necessary to protect the public health and safety or the environment.

(h) The Governor shall appoint the fire chiefs eligible to request notification, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), as the designated representatives of the Governor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Section 73.21 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations for the purpose of receiving information classified as safeguards information pursuant to Part 73 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(i) Any carrier who violates this section, in addition to any penalty provided by law, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. For purposes of this section, each day of a continuing violation is a separate and distinct violation.

When establishing the amount of civil liability pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall consider, in addition to other relevant circumstances, the following:

(1) The extent of the harm caused by the violation.

(2) The persistence of the violation.

(3) The number of prior violations by the same violator.

(4) The deterrent value of the penalty based on the financial resources of the violator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 136.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.7. FLAMMABLE AND COMBUSTIBLE LIQUIDS [34000. - 34100.]



ARTICLE 1. Administration [34000. - 34006.]

34000.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide additional protection to the public and reduce the risk of possible hazards in the highway transportation of hazardous waste and of flammable and combustible liquids in tank vehicles. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall place as a high priority the random inspection of cargo tanks and hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers for compliance with this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 539, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

34001.

The provisions of this division refer to vehicles having a cargo tank and to hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers, as defined in Section 25167.4 of the Health and Safety Code, that are operating on highways within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 945, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

34002.

(a) It is the legislative intention that the regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this division shall apply uniformly throughout the State of California, and no state agency, city, city and county, county, or other political subdivision of this state, including, but not limited to, a chartered city, city and county, or county, shall adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation which is inconsistent with this division.

(b) No other state agency, city, city and county, county, or other public agency of this state, including, but not limited to, a chartered city, city and county, or county, shall enforce any provisions regarding the design and construction of any cargo tank subject to this division, regardless of the location of the cargo tank, or the area of operation of the cargo tank, within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 661, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

34003.

For purposes of this division:

(a) “Cargo tank” has the same meaning as defined in Section 171.8 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) “Cargo tank vehicle” means a truck, trailer, or semitrailer with one or more permanently attached cargo tanks to or forming an integral part of the vehicle.

(c) “Flammable liquids” and “combustible liquids” have the same meanings as defined in Section 173.120 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 219, Sec. 8.   (SB 891)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

34004.

The provisions of this division shall apply equally to new as well as existing cargo tanks.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

34006.

The provisions of this division shall not apply to “wine,” as defined by Section 23007 of the Business and Professions Code, or any other aqueous solution, having an alcoholic content less than, or equal to, 24 percent by volume. This exemption applies only if the nonalcohol portion of the aqueous solution does not fall within the definition of flammable or combustible liquid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 868.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 2. Regulations [34019. - 34024.]

34019.

(a) The commissioner shall adopt reasonable regulations with respect to the following: 

(1) The design, construction, and structural safety of cargo tanks and fire auxiliary equipment. 

(2) To the extent permitted by federal law, the stability of tank vehicles. 

(b) For intrastate shipments in this state, the commissioner shall, as soon as feasible, incorporate any new United States Department of Transportation standards concerning interstate shipments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1043, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

34020.5.

(a) The Department of Transportation, after consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the State Fire Marshal, and affected local agencies, and following a public hearing subject to Section 21109.5, may regulate the time when tank vehicles may travel through a tunnel on state highways.

(b) In evaluating the use of a tunnel on a state highway, the Department of Transportation shall conduct a traffic and engineering survey which includes an analysis of the relative risks to public safety in determining the feasibility of reasonable alternative routes.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a tunnel is a horizontal passage enclosed on the sides and top containing a roadway of a length of not less than 300 feet.

(d) No prohibition or restriction adopted pursuant to this section shall be effective until appropriate signs have been posted giving notice thereof to drivers approaching the tunnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1255, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

34021.

The regulations adopted by the commissioner shall make reasonable allowances for cargo tanks in existence when the regulations become effective. No allowance shall, however, be made for any cargo tank which because of its design or construction constitutes a distinct hazard to life or property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 661, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

34022.

In adopting the regulations, the commissioner shall consider, as evidence of generally accepted safety standards, the publications of the National Fire Protection Association and the United States Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 661, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

34024.

The regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this division shall be adopted, amended, and repealed in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 166.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [34060. - 34064.]

34060.

The commissioner shall provide for the establishment, operation, and enforcement of random on- and off-highway inspections of cargo tanks and hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers. The commissioner shall also provide training in the inspection of cargo tanks and hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers to employees of the department whose primary duties include the enforcement of laws and regulations relating to commercial vehicles and who, thereafter, are required to perform random inspections of cargo tanks and hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers to determine whether or not the cargo tanks and hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers are designed, constructed, and maintained in accordance with the regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this code and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 945, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

34060.5.

Any required pressure, vacuum, or hydrostatic testing of a cargo tank shall be performed, or be caused to be performed, by the carrier, operator, or consultant who shall certify in writing that the cargo tank meets the requirements of the United States Department of Transportation, the State Air Resources Board, and the commissioner. An authorized representative of the department may observe or require these tests. Records of these certifications shall be maintained at the carrier’s place of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 661, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

34061.

The department shall compile data and annually publish a report relating to the level of cargo tank and hazardous waste transport vehicle and container inspections conducted during the previous year. The data included in the report shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The number of inspections conducted.

(b) The number of violations recorded.

(c) The number of on-highway incidents involving cargo tanks and hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers that were reported to the Office of Emergency Services under Section 8574.17 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 526.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

34064.

Any duly authorized employee of the department may inspect cargo tanks and hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers, or the appurtenances and equipment thereof, in terminals, yards, or similar places, as often as may be necessary for the purpose of ascertaining and causing to be corrected any conditions likely to cause damage to any personal or real property or injury or death to any person or animal or any violation of the provisions or intent of this division. Any duly authorized employee of the department may enter upon private property to conduct those inspections. The owner, lessee, bailee, manager, or operator of that property shall permit any duly authorized employee of the department to enter the property and inspect cargo tanks and hazardous waste transport vehicles and containers for the purpose stated in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 539, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 5. Violations [34100. - 34100.]

34100.

A violation of this division or of any regulation adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this division is a misdemeanor. No person shall operate a tank vehicle upon a highway in violation of this division or of any regulation adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 34102 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 539, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.8. SAFETY REGULATIONS [34500. - 34520.5.]

34500.

The department shall regulate the safe operation of the following vehicles:

(a) Motortrucks of three or more axles that are more than 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating.

(b) Truck tractors.

(c) Buses, schoolbuses, school pupil activity buses, youth buses, farm labor vehicles, modified limousines, and general public paratransit vehicles.

(d) Trailers and semitrailers designed or used for the transportation of more than 10 persons, and the towing motor vehicle.

(e) Trailers and semitrailers, pole or pipe dollies, auxiliary
 dollies, and logging dollies used in combination with vehicles listed in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), or (j). This subdivision does not include camp trailers, trailer coaches, and utility trailers.

(f) A combination of a motortruck and a vehicle or vehicles set forth in subdivision (e) that exceeds 40 feet in length when coupled together.

(g) A vehicle, or a combination of vehicles, transporting hazardous materials.

(h) Manufactured homes that, when moved upon the highway, are required to be moved pursuant to a permit, as specified in Section 35780 or 35790.

(i) A park trailer, as described in Section 18009.3 of the Health and Safety Code, that, when moved upon a highway, is required to be moved pursuant to a permit pursuant to Section 35780.

(j) Any other motortruck regulated by the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Consumer Affairs, or the United States Secretary of Transportation.

(k) A commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or more pounds or a commercial motor vehicle of any gross vehicle weight rating towing a vehicle described in subdivision (e) with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 10,000 pounds, except combinations including camp trailers, trailer coaches, or utility trailers. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “commercial motor vehicle” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 226, Sec. 13.   (AB 3278)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

34500.1.

In addition to the duties imposed by Section 34500, the department shall regulate the safe operation of tour buses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1306, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

34500.2.

No additional inspection shall be required under this division on any vehicle which is owned and operated by a public agency and is used for responding to and returning from an emergency, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 35002, during the duration of the emergency, as determined by the public agency, if an inspection pursuant to Section 1215 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations has been completed on the vehicle within the past 24 hours. Any vehicle used in responding to an emergency shall be inspected immediately upon the termination of the emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 899, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

34500.3.

(a) The department shall adopt rules and regulations that are designed to promote the safe operation of vehicles, regarding cargo securement standards. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the securement regulations adopted by the United States Department of Transportation in Part 393 (commencing with Section 393.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those regulations now exist or are amended in the future.

(b) Regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) do not apply to a farmer transporting his or her own hay or straw, incidental to his or her farming operation, if that transportation requires that the farmer use a highway,
 except that this subdivision does not relieve the farmer from loading and securing the hay or straw in a safe manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 57.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

34500.4.

(a) Not later than July 1, 2017, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall implement a program to conduct safety inspections of modified limousine terminals that are operated by passenger stage corporations pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1031) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code or by charter-party carriers of passengers pursuant to the Passenger Charter-party Carriers’ Act (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5351) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code).

(b) (1) The inspection
 program shall include, but is not limited to, the safe operation of the vehicle, the installation of safety equipment, the retention of maintenance logs, accident reports, and records of driver discipline, compliance with federal and state motor vehicle safety standards, the examination of a preventative maintenance program, and, if ownership of the modified limousine has been transferred, the transmission of relevant safety and maintenance information of the limousine.

(2) Pursuant to the safety inspection program, the department shall conduct an inspection of each terminal of a charter-party carrier of passengers and passenger stage corporation that operates modified limousines at least once every 13 months.

(3) The department shall adopt emergency regulations for purposes of this subdivision. The adoption by the department of regulations implementing this section shall be
 deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action to the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations shall remain in effect for no more than one year, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(4) (A) The department shall adopt regulations to establish an inspection fee to be collected every 13 months, based on the number of modified limousines operated by a single charter-party carrier or passenger stage corporation. The fee shall be in an amount sufficient to offset the costs to administer the inspection program and shall not be used to supplant or support any other inspection program conducted by the department. The fee shall be in addition to any
 other required fee. When developing the regulations, the department shall consider measures that increase efficiencies to limit the financial impact to charter-party carriers of passengers and passenger stage corporations subject to the fee. The department shall promulgate the regulations in consultation with appropriate interested parties.

(B) The fee structure established pursuant to this subdivision shall apply to modified limousines that are required to undergo a safety inspection pursuant to this section.

(C) The fee established pursuant to this subdivision shall be collected by the Public Utilities Commission and deposited into the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund to cover the costs of the inspections conducted by the department.

(5) The department shall transmit to the Public Utilities
 Commission inspection data of modified limousine terminals inspected pursuant to this program, as specified in the program regulations.

(c) Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the established inspection program administered by the department for buses pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 480, Sec. 2.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

34500.5.
